District of Columbia statutes.
2-213.01

Automatic data processing — Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Automatic data processing” means the use of computers for the dissemination, storage, retrieval, and reporting of information associated with an administrative or managerial function.

(2)

“Automated data system” means a set of logically related computer programs designed to accomplish specific objectives or functions.

(3)

“Computer” means an electromechanical device capable of accepting information and data, performing logical and arithmetical operations, and reporting the results.

(4)

“Hardware” means input and output devices, arithmetic and control circuits, and memory devices.

(5)

“Information systems” means a single network or networks of steps for processing information that is associated with a particular operation or a set of related operations.

(6)

“Information systems technology” means the applied science associated with the development of networks for the processing of information.

(7)

“Software” means the procedures, instructions, code sets, assemblers, compilers, and all other associated supporting processes required to run a computer program on the equipment itself.

Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-168, § 2, 32 DCR 721
1981 Ed., § 1-1134.
For temporary establishment of an Office of the Chief Technology Officer, see § 1412 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), and see § 1412 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
Section 2101 of D.C. Act 12-564 provided for the application of the act.
Establishment of Office of the Chief Technology Officer: Section 1812 of D.C. Law 12-175 established, in the Executive Branch of the government of the District of Columbia, an Office of the Chief Technology Officer under the supervision of a Chief Technology Officer, who shall carry out the functions and authorities assigned to that office.